Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1235
Tenure; contract of certificated employee; how treated.

The contract of a certificated employee shall be deemed renewed and remain in full force and effect unless amended, terminated, or not renewed in accordance with sections 79-1234 to 79-1239.

Laws 1986, LB 997, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2217;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 952.